Massachusetts, session 194th, H3469.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 40 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following sections:-
Section 70. Approval for Solar and Energy Storage Permit Applications
(a) The Permit Granting Authority shall allow for electronic submission of the permit
application and associated documentation for the installation of a solar PV system, solar thermal
system, building-integrated PV system, energy storage device, or a solar system combined with
an energy storage device. All required permitting documentation and forms shall be published on
the Permit Granting Authority’s publicly accessible internet website. The Permit Granting
Authority shall authorize an electronic signature for the permit application and other
of 3

documentation in lieu of a wet signature by an applicant. Electronic submission, including online
payment of associated permitting fees, shall be offered through either an online portal available
on the website of the Permit Granting Authority or via electronic mail to a dedicated account that
shall be capable of receiving permit applications.
(b) Upon submission of required permit application documents, the application shall be
deemed complete if, after five business days have elapsed, the Permit Granting Authority has not
issued a written correction notice detailing all deficiencies in the application and identifying
additional information explicitly necessary for the Permit Granting Authority to complete a
review.
(c) An application shall be deemed approved and the applicant may begin installation if
ten business days after the application was deemed complete has elapsed and the following are
true:
(i) the Permit Granting Authority has not administratively approved the application.
(ii) the Permit Granting Authority has not denied the permit.
(d) A Permit Granting Authority may use an automated permitting platform that verifies
code compliance and issues permits in real time to satisfy the requirements of subdivisions (a),
(b), and (c). An applicant may begin installation after the issuance of a permit from such an
automated permitting platform.
Section 71. Solar and Energy Storage Inspections
(a) Applicant shall notify the Permit Granting Authority upon completion of system
installation. Permit Granting Authorities shall require no more than one inspection for a solar PV
of 3

system, building-integrated PV system, solar thermal system, energy storage device, or the solar
system combined with an energy storage device in order for the system or device to receive a
certificate of completion. The Permit Granting Authority shall issue a certificate of completion
no later than 10 business days following the receipt of notice from the applicant that the system,
device, or combined system and device, is installed.
(b) An electric distribution company shall not require additional inspections by the
electric distribution company or any other entity as a precondition to granting the customer
permission to operate.
of 3